Washington statutes.
RCW 43.102.800

Assessment of jurisdiction of office—Report. (Expires July 1, 2025.)

(1) In consultation with the director, the advisory board shall assess whether the jurisdiction of the office should be expanded to conduct investigations of other types of incidents committed by involved officers, including but not limited to other types of in-custody deaths not involving use of force but otherwise involving criminal acts committed by involved officers as well as sexual assaults committed by involved officers, subject to the same standard under RCW 43.102.080(2)(b). The advisory board must consider available data and information on other types of in custody deaths not involving use of force but otherwise involving criminal acts committed by involved officers as well as other types of incidents, the capacity and resources of the office, and any modifications or additions to procedures and processes necessary for the office to conduct investigations of those incidents. The advisory board must consider the recommendations and counsel of the director when conducting the assessment under this section.

(2) At the request of the advisory board, the office shall conduct analysis of available data, including identified trends and patterns, and other information relevant to in-custody deaths involving criminal acts committed by involved officers, sexual assaults committed by involved officers, and other types of incidents as requested by the advisory board.

(3) The advisory board shall submit a report with related recommendations to the legislature and governor by November 1, 2023.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "in-custody death" means a death of an individual while under physical control of a general authority Washington law enforcement agency or a limited authority Washington law enforcement agency as defined in RCW 10.93.020 or a city, county, or regional adult or juvenile institution, correctional, jail, holding, or detention facility as defined in RCW 70.48.020, 72.09.015, or 13.40.020.

(5) This section expires July 1, 2025.

[ 2024 c 64 s 6; 2021 c 318 s 502.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2021 c 318: See note following RCW 43.102.020.